Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1184.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 19PRISON INDUSTRY ENHANCEMENT AUTHORITYSec.1901. Scope of chapter.1902. Intent.1903. Definitions.1904. Prison Industry Enhancement Authority.1905. Powers and duties of authority.1906. Cooperation with private industry.1234567891011121314151617181920 1907. Minimum requirements of private sector prison industry.1908. Wages and deductions.1909. Administrative support.1910. Immunities not waived.1911. Civil actions.1912. Construction of chapter.1913. Monetary limitations.§ 1901. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the Prison Industry Enhancement Authority.§ 1902. Intent.It is the intent of the General Assembly that joint ventures between correctional facilities and private industry be established so that incarcerated individuals in correctional facilities be productively engaged. Private industry in this Commonwealth will gain access to an expanded labor force while not displacing job opportunities for civilian labor in the community. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the privatization of correctional facilities in this Commonwealth. It is further the intent of the General Assembly to structure the use and availability of incarcerated individual labor and regulate its use to assure that incarcerated individual labor will not be used to replace work opportunities for unemployed or underemployed residents of this Commonwealth or to create competitive advantages for businesses participating in the prison labor programs. The private sector prison industry will not result in bargaining agreements for civilian laborers. It is further the intent of the General Assembly that incarcerated individuals who are deemed eligible in these jobs be able to:20260SB1184PN1434 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Develop positive work habits that will assist them in securing and holding gainful employment in the public and private sectors subsequent to their release from incarceration.(2) Pay a reasonable portion of the room and board in a correctional facility.(3) Accept responsibility for the consequences of their actions by compensating victims of crime through deductions from their earnings.(4) Provide financial assistance to their dependents, thus strengthening and promoting family ties while reducing the likelihood that their families may eventually have to rely upon public assistance.§ 1903. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authority." The Prison Industry Enhancement Authority established in this chapter."Certification." The process where an applicant demonstrates assurances of authority and compliance with mandatory program criteria and describes key project elements as required by Federal law."Correctional facility." A jail, prison or detention facility operated by the Commonwealth or by a county or jointly by more than one county and used for the detention and confinement of persons convicted and under sentence for violations of the criminal laws of this Commonwealth. The term includes a motivational boot camp as defined in section 3903 (relating to definitions). The term does not include a facility 20260SB1184PN1434 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 used for the detention and confinement of juvenile offenders or a privately operated jail, prison or detention facility."Cost accounting center." A specific industry program operated under the private sector Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program."County commissioners." Elected county commissioners or the equivalent governing body of any county, regardless of form of government."Director of correctional industries." An individual who has authority to operate and manage the Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program under the direct supervision of the Secretary of Corrections and the Prison Industry Enhancement Authority."Employer model." An arrangement under which a private business, private enterprise or nonprofit entity owns and operates the cost accounting center with limited State or local government involvement by controlling the hiring, firing, training, supervision and payment of the incarcerated individual workforce, and the department assumes no major role in the industry operation, does not direct production and exercises minimum control over incarcerated individual labor performance."Incarcerated individual." An individual who has been convicted of a crime and is serving a sentence in a correctional facility."Local workforce development area." A geographical area as defined in section 501(a) of the act of December 18, 2001 (P.L.949, No.114), known as the Workforce Development Act."Open market." An unrestricted stream of commerce within this Commonwealth and outside the borders of this Commonwealth in interstate commerce.20260SB1184PN1434 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Private business," "private enterprise" or "nonprofit entity." An individual, firm, partnership, corporation or other lawful commercial enterprise or nonprofit organization that, under this chapter, operates a private sector prison industry and employs State or county incarcerated individuals."Private sector prison industry." A private business, private enterprise or nonprofit entity that produces goods or services employing incarcerated individual labor in or on the property of a State or county correctional facility under the employer model."Program." The Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program established under Federal law."Superintendent." The person in primary charge of the administration and managers of a State correctional facility."Warden." The person in primary charge of the administration and management of a county correctional institution or multicounty correctional facility.§ 1904. Prison Industry Enhancement Authority.(a) Establishment.--There is established an authority to be known as the Prison Industry Enhancement Authority.(b) Composition.--The authority shall consist of the following members:(1) The secretary or a designee who shall serve as chair.(2) The Secretary of Labor and Industry or a designee.(3) The director of correctional industries.(4) Two representatives from organized labor appointed by the Governor from a list submitted by the Statewide labor organizations in this Commonwealth.(5) One county commissioner nominated by the County 20260SB1184PN1434 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania and appointed by the Governor.(6) One warden appointed by the Governor.(7) One representative from the business community appointed by the Governor from a list submitted by the business community.(8) One superintendent appointed by the secretary.(9) The Victim Advocate or a designee.(c) Terms.--Terms for members shall be as follows:(1) Three years for the county commissioner.(2) Two years for the representative from the business community.(3) Two years for the warden and the superintendent.(4) Two years for the representatives from organized labor.(5) The secretary, the Secretary of Labor and Industry, the director of correctional industries and the representative from the Office of Victim Advocate shall serve continuously.(d) Reappointment.--A member of the authority may be eligible for reappointment. A member shall continue to serve after the expiration of the member's term until a successor is appointed.(e) Vacancies.--A vacancy shall be filled by the original appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired term. A vacancy shall be filled within 90 days of the occurrence of the vacancy.(f) Meetings.--The authority shall meet biannually and upon the request of the chair or three or more members. All meetings of the authority shall be held in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 20260SB1184PN1434 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 7 (relating to open meetings).(g) Quorum.--For the transaction of general business of the authority, four members shall constitute a quorum. A majority vote of the members present will be necessary for a private sector prison industry application to be approved. Each approval of a private sector prison industry application shall be made by a vote at a duly constituted meeting of the authority.(h) Compensation.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, members shall receive no compensation for their services on the authority, but shall be reimbursed by the department from the department's Manufacturing Fund under section 3122 (relating to Manufacturing Fund) for reasonable and necessary expenses.(i) Administration of authority.--The department shall furnish administrative support to the authority. Legal counsel for the authority shall be furnished by the Office of General Counsel.§ 1905. Powers and duties of authority.The authority shall have the powers and duties to:(1) Authorize the department to apply to the United States Department of Justice, Bureau of Justice Assistance or any successors for certification, as an umbrella authority, to assist other units of government seeking to participate in the program.(2) Act as an intermediary between the department, and its designees, and the United States Department of Justice, Bureau of Justice Assistance or any successors in complying with the mandatory criteria and program requirements for private sector prison industries in this Commonwealth.(3) Adopt procedures for determining whether a prospective private sector prison industry proposed by the 20260SB1184PN1434 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department or any county correctional agency complies with the requirements of the program and other State law not inconsistent with this chapter.(4) Approve or disapprove proposals submitted to the authority from the department, or its designees, for private sector prison industry for inclusion or continuation in the program.(5) Monitor the department and its designees to ensure continuing compliance with this chapter and Federal and State law and provide proper notification of violations and proposed actions taken to ensure compliance and remediation.(6) Designate which services to be performed or articles manufactured or assembled by incarcerated individuals are conforming to the program regulations and can be sold on the open market.(7) Monitor an approved private sector prison industry to ensure that it is complying with applicable labor standards specified in section 1906(c) (relating to cooperation with private industry) and any other applicable Federal or State law.(8) Cancel any private sector prison industry where the authority determines that the private sector prison industry has not complied with the requirements of this chapter or has violated another Federal or State law applicable to work performed under this chapter.§ 1906. Cooperation with private industry.(a) General rule.--Upon the approval of the authority, the department or a county correctional facility, with the approval of its governing board, may enter into contracts with a private business, private enterprise or nonprofit organization to permit 20260SB1184PN1434 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the employment of incarcerated individuals to perform designated work under the employer model. The department shall remain responsible for the custody of individuals incarcerated in a State correctional institution who are working for a cost accounting center operated by the department. The county shall remain responsible for the custody of individuals incarcerated in a county correctional institution who are working for a cost accounting center operated by the county. The contractual arrangement authorized by this chapter shall not create any third-party rights in any incarcerated individual.(b) Status of incarcerated individual.--No incarcerated individual compensated for participation in the program shall be considered to be an employee of the Commonwealth or the county nor shall the incarcerated individual be afforded the rights and privileges of Commonwealth or county employees. Where a private business, private enterprise or nonprofit organization is directly employing an incarcerated individual under the employer model the private business, private enterprise or nonprofit organization shall be solely responsible and liable for compliance with all applicable labor standards specified in this chapter or in other applicable Federal or State laws. No incarcerated individual may be employed under this chapter for more than 40 hours in any workweek.(c) Certain rights preserved.--Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to restore, in whole or in part, the civil rights of participating incarcerated individuals, except that participating incarcerated individuals shall be afforded the protection of 29 U.S.C. Ch. 8 (relating to fair labor standards), 42 U.S.C. § 2000a-1 (relating to prohibition against discrimination or segregation required by any law, statute, 20260SB1184PN1434 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ordinance, regulation, rule or order of a State or State agency), 29 U.S.C. Ch. 15 (relating to occupational safety and health), 42 U.S.C. Ch. 76 (relating to age discrimination in federally assisted programs), 42 U.S.C. Ch. 126 (relating to equal opportunity for individuals with disabilities), the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.637, No.329), known as the Wage Payment and Collection Law, and the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, solely to the extent that they apply to the private sector prison industry employment relationship.(d) Consent to deduction.--An incarcerated individual may participate in the program established under this chapter only on a voluntary basis and must consent, in advance, to the specific deductions from gross wages, as specified under section 1908 (relating to wages and deductions). An incarcerated individual performing services for a cost accounting center shall indicate, in writing, that the incarcerated individual:(1) agrees voluntarily to participate in the cost accounting center activities; and(2) agrees voluntarily, and in advance, to specific deductions made from gross wages, as well as all other financial arrangements made as to wages earned through participation in the cost accounting center's activities.§ 1907. Minimum requirements of private sector prison industry.(a) Requirements enumerated.--A private business, private enterprise or nonprofit organization may not enter into a contract under section 1906 (relating to cooperation with 20260SB1184PN1434 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 private industry) unless it demonstrates all of the following:(1) The private business, private enterprise or nonprofit organization, the department or the governing authority of the county correctional system, whichever is applicable, consulted with local union central bodies and with local businesses that may be affected by the private business, private enterprise or nonprofit organization participating in the program.(2) The private business, private enterprise or nonprofit organization has submitted information in a form and manner approved by the authority that its participation in the program will not:(i) demonstrably result in the displacement of employees in the local workforce development area;(ii) be applied in skills, crafts or trades in which there is a surplus of available gainful labor in the locality; or(iii) impair existing contracts for goods and services. A contract may not be executed by or with a private sector prison industry employer that will permit the employment of incarcerated individuals in the same job classifications or similar work duties or assignments as individuals who are on strike as a result of a labor dispute as defined in the act of June 1, 1937 (P.L.1168, No.294), known as the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Act, or who are otherwise involved in a labor dispute as that term is defined by Federal law, including a lockout.(3) The private business, private enterprise or nonprofit organization has provided proof of security for the payment of workers' compensation as provided in section 305 20260SB1184PN1434 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, for work to be performed under the contract. Security for the payment of workers' compensation shall be maintained throughout any program authorized under this chapter.(4) The work to be performed under the contract is not covered by the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, or the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act.(5) The private business, private enterprise or nonprofit organization has provided proof that it has not been found in the last 10 years to be in violation of any law listed in section 1906(c).(6) Any activity undertaken by the private business, private enterprise or nonprofit organization under the contract shall be in compliance with 42 U.S.C. Ch. 55 (relating to National Environmental Policy).(b) Priorities.--When reviewing a potential private sector prison industry, the authority shall consider the impact on the employment of persons in the private business sector of this Commonwealth and consider establishing joint ventures that will retain or reclaim jobs in this Commonwealth, support emerging Commonwealth industries or create jobs for a deficient labor market.§ 1908. Wages and deductions.(a) Wages.--All incarcerated individuals participating in a cost accounting center's activities shall be compensated at a rate that is not less than the wages paid for work of a similar nature in private industry in the local workforce development 20260SB1184PN1434 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 area in which the activity is performed, as determined after consultation with the Department of Labor and Industry. The Department of Labor and Industry shall base its determination on estimated occupational data available for the local workforce development area. An incarcerated individual may not receive compensation that is less than the minimum wage established by Federal or State law, whichever is higher, except as specified in Federal and State law. Wages shall be paid no less frequently than biweekly. Any wages remaining after the deductions under subsection (b) shall be maintained by the appropriate correctional authority in a fund in the incarcerated individual's name. The amount remaining shall be returned to the incarcerated individual at the time of release. The correctional authority may permit the incarcerated individual to draw a portion of the money for other purposes deemed to be appropriate by the correctional authority.(b) Deductions.--(1) An incarcerated individual shall have deducted from gross compensation received:(i) Federal, State and local taxes.(ii) Contributions to the Crime Victim Services and Compensation Fund or equivalent fund established by law to compensate victims of crime and court-ordered victim restitution, which contributions combined may not be less than 5% nor more than 20% of the incarcerated individual's gross wages.(iii) A reasonable portion of room and board and administrative costs for the incarcerated individual in a correctional facility as determined by the department or the governing body of the county correctional agency.20260SB1184PN1434 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) An allocation for support of the incarcerated individual's immediate family pursuant to State statute, court order or agreement by the incarcerated individual.(v) All deductions provided for in subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv), in their entirety, may not exceed 70% of an incarcerated individual's gross wages. The incarcerated individual employee shall be paid, credited with, or otherwise benefit from, the gross remainder. The remaining gross amount may be directed to incarcerated individuals' expense accounts, or to the settling of the incarcerated individuals' legal obligations, including the payment of court-ordered fines and restitution.(2) No other deductions from gross compensation are permitted unless otherwise authorized under Federal or State law. Deductions from gross pay shall not in the aggregate exceed 80% of gross wages. Each incarcerated individual employed shall receive a written statement of the description and amount of each deduction.(c) Workers' compensation.--The provision of benefits and compensation to incarcerated individuals for injuries sustained in the course of employment provided for under this chapter shall be subject to any limitations specified under the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, except that an approved private sector prison industry shall be liable for compensation under the Workers' Compensation Act for any work-related injuries resulting from work performed under this chapter notwithstanding section 306(a.1) of the Workers' Compensation Act, relating to prison labor. Nothing in this act shall require the payment of 20260SB1184PN1434 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disability compensation under section 306(a) or (b) of the Workers' Compensation Act for any period during which the incarcerated individual remains incarcerated. Incarcerated individuals and their dependents are precluded from filing claims against the Uninsured Employers Guaranty Fund for injuries sustained for work performed under this chapter.(d) Unemployment insurance.--An incarcerated individual is not qualified to receive unemployment insurance payments.§ 1909. Administrative support.The department shall provide the authority with reasonable administrative and clerical support services subject to the availability of funds.§ 1910. Immunities not waived.No provision of this chapter shall waive or impair any sovereign, government, qualified or other immunity from or defense against suit available to the Commonwealth and its departments, boards, officers, employees and agents or the political subdivisions of this Commonwealth and their agencies, officers and employees.§ 1911. Civil actions.An incarcerated individual may not bring a civil action before any court, independent commission or authority of this Commonwealth against the authority, the Commonwealth or its agencies, officers or employees or the political subdivisions of this Commonwealth and their agencies, officers and employees based upon a contractual arrangement authorized under this chapter.§ 1912. Construction of chapter.No provision of this chapter may be construed:(1) To establish a civil cause of action against the 20260SB1184PN1434 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority, the Commonwealth or its agencies, officers or employees or the political subdivisions of this Commonwealth and their agencies, officers and employees.(2) To establish an enforceable right in any person to obtain or retain employment in the private sector prison industry.(3) To require the department or any county to propose or permit a private sector prison industry within the correctional facility.(4) To affect or change the method or manner of incarcerated individual work assignments within a correctional facility or the statutory authority to compel the labor on behalf of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof.§ 1913. Monetary limitations.There shall be no monetary limitations on the amount of goods and services supplied to the open market unless otherwise stated by the authority.Section 2. All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of 61 Pa.C.S. Ch. 19. Section 3. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20260SB1184PN1434 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021